Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1827.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Earlier Insurance Coverage for Osteoporosis Treatments Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:(1) Many individuals experiencing menopause have a range of signs and symptoms, which may include osteoporosis.(2) Osteoporosis may occur during menopause as a result of lower estrogen levels in the body.(3) According to the Cleveland Clinic, throughout the first five years of menopause, as much as 20% of bone loss occurs.(4) Although the average age of women entering menopause 123456789101112131415161718 in the United States is 51 years of age, bone density screenings are recommended for women over 65 years of age.(5) Due to the lack of bone density screenings earlier in life, which would allow for more effective prevention and treatment measures before osteoporosis is more advanced and harder to treat, for most women, a bone fracture may be the first sign of osteoporosis.(6) Among individuals with osteoporosis, vertebral or spine fractures, fractures in the forearm or wrist and hip fractures are the most common.(7) Bone fractures related to osteoporosis that occur in the spine or hip areas are especially concerning, as mortality rates for older adults who have experienced a hip fracture are significantly higher than those of older adults who have not experienced a hip fracture.(8) Bone mineral density testing to measure the amount of mineral in an individual's bones may be helpful in screening for and diagnosing osteoporosis.(9) Osteoporosis medications can be used to slow or stop the breakdown of bone or assist in the growth of new bone.(10) Nutritional supplements, increasing exercise and strength training may also be helpful in reducing the effects of osteoporosis and alleviating issues with bone density and muscle pain.Section 3. Legislative purpose.The purpose of this act is to provide coverage for preventative measures, screenings and treatments for osteoporosis beginning before or at the onset of menopause.Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall 20250HB1827PN2252 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Bone mineral density testing." An imaging test that measures the amount of mineral in a certain volume of bone, which is an indirect indicator of bone strength."Cost-sharing." The following:(1) The share of the health care costs covered by a health insurance policy that an enrollee or covered person pays out of pocket.(2) The term includes a deductible, coinsurance, copayment or similar charge.(3) The term does not include a premium, a balance billed amount from an out-of-network provider or the cost of a noncovered service."Department." The Department of Human Services of the Commonwealth."Dietary supplement." A dietary supplement prescribed for the maintenance or promotion of bone health."Health insurance policy." As defined in section 2102 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921."Menopause." The cessation of menstrual periods for 12 consecutive months, which can occur by a natural process of the body or can be caused medically or surgically and may be accompanied by any of the following symptoms:(1) Irregular menstrual periods.(2) Hot flashes.(3) Vaginal or bladder problems.(4) Decrease in fertility.(5) Loss of bone density, including osteoporosis.20250HB1827PN2252 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Elevated low-density lipoprotein cholesterol levels.(7) Sleep disruption, including night sweats."Osteoporosis." A disease characterized by loss of bone mass or structural deterioration, causing a decrease in bone strength and an increased risk of fractures.Section 5. Duties of department.(a) Medical assistance coverage.--Subject to Federal approval, the department shall provide medical assistance coverage for screenings and treatments for osteoporosis for eligible and enrolled medical assistance recipients who have reached menopause. The coverage required under this section shall, at a minimum, include:(1) Coverage for bone mineral density testing.(2) Coverage for hormonal and nonhormonal treatments used to treat menopausal symptoms, including osteoporosis.(3) Coverage for all drugs, devices and combination products approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the prevention or treatment of osteoporosis.(b) State plan amendment or Federal waiver.--The department shall seek a State plan amendment or Federal waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, if needed, for the provision of the services listed in this section under the medical assistance program.Section 6. Duties of insurers.(a) Coverage requirement.--A health insurance policy offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth shall provide coverage of preventative measures, testing and treatments for osteoporosis for covered individuals who have reached menopause. The coverage required under this section shall, at a minimum, 20250HB1827PN2252 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include:(1) Coverage for bone mineral density testing.(2) Coverage or reimbursement for preventative measures, including:(i) Dietary supplements.(ii) Weight training or personal training services.(iii) Physical therapy.(3) Coverage for hormonal and nonhormonal treatments used to treat menopausal symptoms, including osteoporosis.(4) Coverage for all drugs, devices and combination products approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the prevention or treatment of osteoporosis.(b) Terms and conditions.--The coverage required under this section shall be subject to the terms and conditions of a health insurance policy, including provisions relating to medical necessity, cost-sharing and utilization review.(c) Condition.--Coverage may be conditioned upon the covered individual receiving a prescription for the items under subsection (a)(2).Section 7. Applicability.This act shall apply as follows:(1) For a health insurance policy for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to a policy for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For a health insurance policy for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, this act shall apply to a policy issued or 20250HB1827PN2252 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1827PN2252 - 6 - 1234